Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.249

Annexation of fire districts—Ownership of assets of fire protection district—Outstanding indebtedness not affected.

When any portion of a fire protection district is annexed by or incorporated into a city or town, any outstanding indebtedness, bonded or otherwise, shall remain an obligation of the taxable property annexed or incorporated as if the annexation or incorporation had not occurred.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.13.249. Prior: 1963 c 231 s 5.]